Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.100

Legal qualification of officer, shareholder or employee to render professional service, effect.

Unless a director, officer, shareholder, agent or employee of a corporation organized under this chapter who has been rendering professional service to the public is legally qualified at all times to render such professional services within at least one state in which the corporation conducts business, he or she shall sever all employment with, and financial interests in, such corporation forthwith. A corporation's failure to require compliance with this provision shall constitute a ground for the forfeiture of its articles of incorporation and its dissolution. When a corporation's failure to comply with this provision is brought to the attention of the office of the secretary of state, the secretary of state forthwith shall certify that fact to the attorney general for appropriate action to dissolve the corporation.

[ 1998 c 293 s 4; 1969 c 122 s 10.]